Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 2. Documentary Evidence Generally

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

32A C.J.S. Evidence §§ 813 to 1053.

§ 1-12-201.
Copies of documents filed with interstate commerce or public service
commissions.

Printed copies of schedules,
classifications and tariffs of rates, fares, charges, rules and regulations
and supplements thereto, filed with the interstate commerce commission
or the public service commission, which show respectively an interstate
commerce commission number and an effective date or a public service
commission number and an effective date, may be received in evidence
without certification and shall be presumed to be correct copies of
the originals on file with the interstate commerce commission or on
file with the public service commission.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 211, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-164; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-12-204.

Cross references. —

For provision that all certificates issued by the secretary of state and all copies of documents filed in his office in accordance with the provisions of the Wyoming Business Corporation Act shall be prima facie evidence of the facts contained, see §

17-16-127

.

As to copies of county instruments and transcripts of records as evidence, see §

18-3-104

.

As to certificate or record of marriage or a certified copy thereof as presumptive evidence of the fact of marriage, see §

20-1-107

.

As to use of copies of records of state highway commission as evidence, see §

24-2-101

.

As to use of certified copy of surveys constructed by mining companies and filed with secretary of state as evidence, see §

30-1-128

.

As to use of abstract of motor vehicle operating record as evidence in action for damages or criminal proceedings arising out of motor vehicle accidents, see §

31-9-104

.

As to use of report of accident required to be filed under the Motor Vehicle Safety-Responsibility Act as evidence, see §

31-9-209

.

As to force and effect as evidence of conveyances executed prior to 1882, see §

34-1-122

.

As to admissibility of conveyance or the certified record thereof as evidence, see §

34-1-123

.

As to use of federal land office instruments as evidence, see §

34-1-125

.

As to effect of unsealed writings in evidence, see §

34-2-126

.

As to instruments under Comprehensive Curative Act as evidence after validation, see §

34-8-105

.

As to public service commission, see §

37-2-101

.